Hawaii statutes.
§806-36 Property owned by corporation.
All property, real and personal, whereof any body corporate shall by law have
the management, control, or custody, shall, for the purpose of any indictment
or proceeding against any other person for any offense committed on or in
respect thereof, be deemed to be the property of the body corporate. [L 1876, c
40, §17; RL 1925, §4051; RL 1935, §5510; RL 1945, §10812; RL 1955, §258-22; HRS
§711-36; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next